Massachusetts, session 194th, H1241.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, a health care provider
certifying a patient in accordance with Section 1 of Chapter 94I of the Massachusetts General
Laws may be eligible for reimbursement for such certification by qualifying health plans
regulated under Chapters 32A, 175, 176A, 176B and 176G.
SECTION 2. Health plans may include cannabis for medical use, as defined in Section 1
of Chapter 94I of the Massachusetts General Laws in their formulary, subject to its inclusion on
Schedule II, Schedule III, Schedule IV, Schedule V, or Schedule VI of the Drug Control
Program within the Department of Public Health.
of 1